Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 6 EXEMPTIONS FROM TAXATION
§ 63-602KK. Property exempt from taxation — Certain personal property. —

An item of taxable personal property purchased on or after January 1, 2013, shall be exempt from property taxation if the item of taxable personal property has an acquisition price of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less.
(1)(a) An item of taxable personal property purchased on or after January 1, 2013, shall be exempt from property taxation if the item of taxable personal property has an acquisition price of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less.

For purposes of this section, the term “acquisition cost” means all costs required to put an item of taxable personal property into service and includes:

The purchase price of a new or used item;

The cost of freight and shipping;

The cost of installation, engineering, erection or assembly; and

Sales and use taxes.

For purposes of this subsection, an “item of taxable personal property” means equipment, machinery, furniture or other personal property that is functioning at its highest and best use for the purpose it was designed and constructed and is generally capable of performing that function without being combined with other items of personal property. An item of taxable personal property is not an individual component part of a piece of equipment, machinery, furniture or other personal property as a whole. An item of taxable personal property does not include an improvement to real property, a part that will become an improvement, or anything defined as a fixture.

On and after January 1, 2015, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, each person’s personal property, located in the county, which is not otherwise exempt, shall be exempt to the extent of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). For the purposes of this section, a person includes two (2) or more people using the property in a common enterprise who are within a relationship described in section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 63-3004, Idaho Code.

No later than the third Monday of November 2013, the county clerk of each county shall certify to the state tax commission the amount of exemption from property taxes under subsection (2) of this section, in that county for that year. The certification shall identify the property receiving tax reductions, the value of the property, the property’s location, the amount of the tax levy applicable to personal property in the location, and the tax before and after the exemption allowed in subsection (2) of this section. The certification shall be in the form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall include such additional information as the commission may require by rule as needed to implement the purpose of this section. The certification shall be reviewed and, if necessary, corrected by the state tax commission.
(3)(a) No later than the third Monday of November 2013, the county clerk of each county shall certify to the state tax commission the amount of exemption from property taxes under subsection (2) of this section, in that county for that year. The certification shall identify the property receiving tax reductions, the value of the property, the property’s location, the amount of the tax levy applicable to personal property in the location, and the tax before and after the exemption allowed in subsection (2) of this section. The certification shall be in the form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall include such additional information as the commission may require by rule as needed to implement the purpose of this section. The certification shall be reviewed and, if necessary, corrected by the state tax commission.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the year beginning January 1, 2014, and every year thereafter, the amount of annual replacement of property tax on personal property exempted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be the amount approved by the state tax commission pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Subject to the limitations of this section, the state tax commission shall reimburse from the amount appropriated for personal property tax replacement in section 63-3638, Idaho Code, the county treasurer of each county for the reduction on the certification provided in subsection (3) of this section. The county treasurer shall reimburse from the amount received to each taxing district within the county an amount in proportion to the amount of reduction shown on the certification in subsection (3) of this section as corrected. The amount that would otherwise be attributable to tax revenues derived from tax levies on personal property exempted by this section within an existing revenue allocation area as defined in section 50-2903(15), Idaho Code, shall be paid directly by the county treasurer to such public body or agency entitled thereto, equal to the amounts that would have been distributed in accordance with the formula for such distribution set forth in section 50-2908, Idaho Code. Taxing districts created on or after January 1, 2013, shall not be eligible for the reimbursement provided for in this paragraph.
(b) The state tax commission shall pay one-half (1/2) of the reimbursement provided in this section no later than December 20 of each year, and the second one-half (1/2) shall be paid by no later than June 20 of the following year. The money received by the county tax collector under the provisions of this section may be considered by counties and other taxing districts and budgeted against at the same time, and in the same manner, and in the same year as revenues from taxation. The total amount paid to the county treasurers shall not exceed the amount certified to the state tax commission under subsection (3) of this section.
(4)(a) Subject to the limitations of this section, the state tax commission shall reimburse from the amount appropriated for personal property tax replacement in section 63-3638, Idaho Code, the county treasurer of each county for the reduction on the certification provided in subsection (3) of this section. The county treasurer shall reimburse from the amount received to each taxing district within the county an amount in proportion to the amount of reduction shown on the certification in subsection (3) of this section as corrected. The amount that would otherwise be attributable to tax revenues derived from tax levies on personal property exempted by this section within an existing revenue allocation area as defined in section 50-2903(15), Idaho Code, shall be paid directly by the county treasurer to such public body or agency entitled thereto, equal to the amounts that would have been distributed in accordance with the formula for such distribution set forth in section 50-2908, Idaho Code. Taxing districts created on or after January 1, 2013, shall not be eligible for the reimbursement provided for in this paragraph.
(b) The state tax commission shall pay one-half (1/2) of the reimbursement provided in this section no later than December 20 of each year, and the second one-half (1/2) shall be paid by no later than June 20 of the following year. The money received by the county tax collector under the provisions of this section may be considered by counties and other taxing districts and budgeted against at the same time, and in the same manner, and in the same year as revenues from taxation. The total amount paid to the county treasurers shall not exceed the amount certified to the state tax commission under subsection (3) of this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the taxation of forest lands or forest products pursuant to chapter 17, title 63, Idaho Code, or the taxation of the net profits of mines pursuant to chapter 28, title 63, Idaho Code.
(5)(a) Nothing contained in this section shall affect the taxation of forest lands or forest products pursuant to chapter 17, title 63, Idaho Code, or the taxation of the net profits of mines pursuant to chapter 28, title 63, Idaho Code.

The exemption from personal property tax provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to motor vehicles, recreational vehicles, aircraft and boats that are not registered with the state of Idaho and for which required registration fees have not been paid.

The application for the exemption provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall be in the form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall include such information as the state tax commission may require by rule as needed to implement the purpose of this section including, but not limited to, a list of each item of personal property, the purchase date of each item of personal property, the unit cost of each item of personal property, if more than the exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this section, and the total cost of the items of personal property.
(6)(a) The application for the exemption provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall be in the form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall include such information as the state tax commission may require by rule as needed to implement the purpose of this section including, but not limited to, a list of each item of personal property, the purchase date of each item of personal property, the unit cost of each item of personal property, if more than the exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this section, and the total cost of the items of personal property.

The application for this exemption, if the county is capable of so providing, may be transmitted by the county assessor electronically, as that term is defined in section 63-115, Idaho Code, when requested by the taxpayer, or mailed by the county assessor to the taxpayer, or his agent or representative at the taxpayer’s last known post office address, no later than March 1 of each year. The transmission or mailing of the application shall also include the taxpayer’s application for the exemption allowed by this section for the last year in which the taxpayer filed an application.

A taxpayer need only make application for the exemption in this section once as long as all of the following conditions are met:

The taxpayer has received the exemption during the previous year as a result of him making a valid application as defined in this section.

The amount of the exemption allowed by this section is more than the taxable value of personal property owned by the taxpayer.

The taxpayer has not made purchases of personal property, excluding items of taxable personal property exempted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, that would cause the taxable value of the personal property owned by the taxpayer to exceed the maximum amount allowed as an exemption by this section.
(d) Knowingly failing to report changes in the taxable value of personal property that exceed the amount of the exemption allowed pursuant to this section shall subject the taxpayer to a fine not in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in addition to other penalties set forth in this chapter.

Recovery of property tax exemptions allowed by this section but improperly claimed:

Upon discovery of evidence, facts or circumstances indicating any exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed, the county assessor shall decide whether the exemption claimed should have been allowed, and if not, notify the board of county commissioners, at which time the board may waive a recovery of the property tax and notify such taxpayer in writing.

The assessment and collection of the recovery of property tax must begin within the seven (7) year period beginning on the date the assessment notice reflecting the improperly claimed exemption was required to be mailed to the taxpayer.

The taxpayer may appeal to the board of tax appeals the decision by the board of county commissioners to assess the recovery of property tax within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.

For purposes of calculating the tax, the amount of the recovered property tax shall be for each year the exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed or approved, up to a maximum of seven (7) years. The amount of the recovery of property tax shall be calculated using the product of the amount of exempted value for each year multiplied by the levy for that year plus costs, late charges and interest for each year at the rates equal to those provided for delinquent property taxes during that year. In cases of fraud, the fine set forth in subsection (6)(d) of this section shall be assessed for each tax year.

Any recovery of property tax shall be due and payable no later than the date provided for property taxes in section 63-903, Idaho Code, and if not timely paid, late charges and interest, beginning the first day of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section, shall be calculated at the current rate provided for property taxes.

Recovered property taxes shall be billed, collected and distributed in the same manner as property taxes. If the recovery is for property tax for which the state provided replacement money, the amounts recovered shall be reported and remitted to the state tax commission, which shall reimburse the general fund. The state tax commission will then notify each affected taxing district or unit of its proportionate share of the recovered property tax, which amount shall be deducted from future payments to be made pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Thirty (30) days after the taxpayer is notified, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall record a notice of intent to attach a lien. Upon the payment in full of such recovered property taxes prior to the attachment of the lien as provided in paragraph (h) of this subsection, or upon the successful appeal by the taxpayer, the county assessor shall record a rescission of the intent to attach a lien within seven (7) business days of receiving such payment or within seven (7) business days of the county commissioners’ decision granting the appeal.

Any unpaid recovered property taxes shall become a lien upon the taxpayer’s personal property in the same manner as provided for property taxes in section 63-206, Idaho Code, except such lien shall attach as of the first day of January in the year following the year the county treasurer sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.
(i) For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection as recovery of property tax shall be treated as property tax revenue.

For operating property with values apportioned to more than one (1) county, the personal property exemption shall be subtracted from the Idaho allocated value prior to apportionment and, for private railcar companies, prior to determining whether their values are to be apportioned. Notwithstanding amounts calculated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the amount of the exemption otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be calculated as follows:

Take the lesser amount of:

The number of counties in which a company has operating property multiplied by one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or

The total statewide value of eligible personal property reported by the company.

Reduce the amount calculated in paragraph (a) of this subsection by the value of any nonoperating personal property granted the exemption otherwise found in subsection (2) of this section, as reported by county assessors.

(c) For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received from distributions pursuant to section 63-3638, Idaho Code, as property tax replacement for the taxable value of property exempt from taxation pursuant to this section shall be treated as property tax revenues.

§ 63-602LL. [Reserved.]

§ 63-602NN. Property exempt from taxation — Certain business property.

Provided that there is a plant investment that meets all tax incentive criteria as defined in subsection (2) of this section, the board of county commissioners may exempt all or a part of the change from the base value attributable directly to the plant investment.

As used in this section:

“Base value” means the assessed value on the county’s property rolls of property associated with the plant investment from the year immediately preceding the year representing the beginning of the project period during which a plant investment pursuant to this section occurs.

“Building or structural components of buildings” means real property improvements to land as defined in section 63-201(11), Idaho Code, that are owned or leased by the taxpayer and located in Idaho within the boundaries of the project site.

“Defined project” means a written plan presented to the county commissioners by a taxpayer outlining projected investment in new plant for new plant and building facilities during a project period and located at a project site.

“Plant investment” means investment in new or existing plant and building facilities. Such plant and building facilities include buildings or structural components of buildings, related parking facilities, food service facilities, business office facilities and other building facilities directly related to the business making the plant investment. Plant investment also includes investments in the personal property associated with the plant and its facilities.

“Project period” means the period of time beginning at the earlier of a physical change to the project site or the first employment of new employees or contractors located in Idaho who are related to the activities at the project site.

“Project site” means an area or areas at which the affected plant and building facilities are located and at which the tax incentive criteria have been or will be met and which are either:

A single geographic area located in this state at which the affected plant and building facilities owned or leased by the taxpayer are located; or

One (1) or more geographic areas located in this state if eighty percent (80%) or more of the plant investment is made at one (1) of the areas.

“Tax incentive criteria” means the following conditions:

The board of county commissioners shall by ordinance establish an investment amount not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) at all project sites within the county for which the exemption and all exemptions thereafter granted shall apply, thereby providing uniformity to all taxpayers;
(ii) The plant investment will bring significant economic benefits to the county; and

The plant or building facilities will be for nonretail purposes that are either commercial or industrial.

The board of county commissioners may grant the property tax exemption for the defined project for a period of up to five (5) years. The agreement shall be considered a contract arrangement between the county and the taxpayer for the exemption time period granted by the board of county commissioners and the annual approval provision contained in subsection (3) of section 63-602, Idaho Code, shall not apply to the exemption provided in this section as long as the contract enumerated in this section is valid and in force and effect. If, within the project period, the use or nature of the defined project or investment in the new plant changes such that the project would no longer qualify for the tax exemption, the board of county commissioners may unilaterally terminate the agreement and withdraw the tax exemption.

When considering whether to grant the property tax exemption, the board of county commissioners may consider trade secrets, as defined in section 74-107(1), Idaho Code, in executive session as allowed in section 74-206(1)(d), Idaho Code.

Before granting a property tax exemption under this section, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public meeting regarding whether to grant the exemption. The board of county commissioners shall provide a summary of the application under consideration, a written notice of the time, date and location of the public meeting, and an invitation to participate in the meeting to all affected taxing districts, urban renewal agencies and the Idaho department of commerce at least five (5) calendar days before the meeting.

Property exempted under this section shall not be included on any new construction roll prepared by the county assessor in accordance with section 63-301A, Idaho Code, until the exemption ceases.

The legislature declares this exemption necessary and just.

§ 63-602OO. Property exempt from taxation — Oil or gas related wells. — The following property is exempt from taxation: wells drilled for the production of oil, gas or hydrocarbon condensate.

§ 63-603. Electric, or gas, public utilities pumping water for irrigation or drainage — Reduction of assessment in accordance with exemption — Credit on customers’ bills or payment to consumers.

The state tax commission shall, at the time of assessment of the property of any electrical, or gas, public utility, cooperative organized under the rural electrification administration act of the United States congress, or other company distributing electrical power (“utility”), determine the amount of the exemption under section 63-602O, Idaho Code, and shall reduce such assessment so that any such utility shall not be required to pay any property taxes upon that portion of its property so exempted.

The full amount of property taxes which would have been due from such utility if such exemption had not been made, shall be credited or paid annually, for the year in which the exemption is made, on the electric or gas bill, to the consumer by the utility furnishing such electricity or gas for irrigation purposes.

If the consumer is not a customer of the deliverer of electrical power or natural gas energy, the full amount of property taxes which would have been due from such utility if such exemption had not been made, shall be paid annually, for the year in which the exemption is made, directly to the consumer by the utility delivering such electricity or gas for irrigation purposes. To qualify for credit or direct payment the person or organization at the point of delivery must also be the person or organization pumping water for irrigation purposes and not a distributor or redistributor of electrical power or natural gas energy.

For the purposes of determining the benefit to which each consumer is entitled by virtue of this exemption, the following procedure is provided.

The amount of such exemption or reduction by the state tax commission shall be as nearly as practicable, such as would yield the amount of property taxes included in the rates of such utility under the tariff schedule(s) applicable to the furnishing of such electricity or gas.

To receive the benefit of the exemption under section 63-602O, Idaho Code, and this section, each consumer who is not a customer of the deliverer of electrical power or gas energy must file an application with the state tax commission on or before April 30 each year except that for the year 1993, only such application may be filed on or before June 15. The state tax commission shall prescribe by rule the form and information necessary for such application.

§ 63-604. Land actively devoted to agriculture defined.

For property tax purposes, land which is actively devoted to agriculture shall be eligible for appraisal, assessment and taxation as agricultural property each year it meets one (1) or more of the following qualifications:

The total area of such land, including the homesite, is more than five (5) contiguous acres, and is actively devoted to agriculture which means:

It is used to produce field crops including, but not limited to, grains, feed crops, fruits and vegetables; or

It is used to produce nursery stock as defined in section 22-2302(11), Idaho Code; or

It is used by the owner for the grazing of livestock to be sold as part of a for-profit enterprise, or is leased by the owner to a bona fide lessee for grazing purposes; or

It is in a cropland retirement or rotation program.

The area of such land is five (5) contiguous acres or less and such land has been actively devoted to agriculture within the meaning of subsection (1)(a) of this section during the last three (3) growing seasons; and

It agriculturally produces for sale or home consumption the equivalent of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the owner’s or lessee’s annual gross income; or

It agriculturally produced gross revenues in the immediately preceding year of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. When the area of land is five (5) contiguous acres or less, such land shall be presumed to be nonagricultural land until it is established that the requirements of this subsection have been met.

Land shall not be classified or valued as agricultural land which is part of a platted subdivision with stated restrictions prohibiting its use for agricultural purposes, whether within or without a city.

Land utilized for the grazing of a horse or other animals kept primarily for personal use or pleasure rather than as part of a bona fide for-profit enterprise shall not be considered to be land actively devoted to agriculture.

Land actively devoted to agriculture, having previously qualified for exemption under this section in the preceding year, or which would have qualified under this section during the current year, shall not lose such qualification due to the owner’s or lessee’s absence in the current year by reason of active military service in a designated combat zone, as defined in section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code. If an owner fails to timely apply for exemption as required in this section solely by reason of active duty in a designated combat zone, as defined in section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code, and the land would otherwise qualify for exemption under this section, then the board of county commissioners of the county in which the land actively devoted to agriculture is located shall refund property taxes, if previously paid, in an amount equal to the exemption which would otherwise have applied.

If the land qualified for exemption pursuant to section 63-602FF, Idaho Code, in 2005, then the land will qualify in 2006 for the exemption pursuant to section 63-602K, Idaho Code, upon the filing of a statement by the owner with the board of county commissioners that the land will be actively devoted to agriculture pursuant to this section in 2006.

For purposes of this section, the act of platting land actively devoted to agriculture does not, in and of itself, cause the land to lose its status as land being actively devoted to agriculture if the land otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this section.
(7) As used in this section:

“Contiguous” means being in actual contact or touching along a boundary or at a point, except no area of land shall be considered not contiguous solely by reason of a roadway or other right-of-way.

“For-profit” means the enterprise will, over some period of time, make or attempt to make a return of income exceeding expenses.

“Platting” means the filing of the drawing, map or plan of a subdivision or a replatting of such, including certification, descriptions and approvals with the proper county or city official.

§ 63-605. Land used to protect wildlife and wildlife habitat.

For the tax year commencing January 1, 2007, an application for appraisal, assessment and taxation under this section as land actively devoted to agriculture pursuant to section 63-604, Idaho Code, shall be filed in the office of the county assessor on or before the fourth Monday in June 2007. For the tax year commencing January 1, 2008, and for each and every year thereafter, an application for appraisal, assessment and taxation under this section as land actively devoted to agriculture pursuant to section 63-604, Idaho Code, shall be filed in the office of the county assessor between January 1 and April 15 of each year for which the requested tax status is to apply. Land eligible for this tax status is land which is either:

Owned and used for wildlife habitat by a private, nonprofit corporation which corporation has a recognized tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which corporation qualifies for exemption status under section 63-602C, Idaho Code, and which corporation is dedicated to the conservation of wildlife or wildlife habitat; or

Being managed pursuant to a conservation easement or a conservation agreement, as defined in this section and which easement or agreement has been entered into with a private, nonprofit corporation which has a tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which corporation qualifies for exemption status under section 63-602C, Idaho Code, and which land qualified, for three (3) consecutive years immediately preceding management of the land pursuant to a conservation easement or a conservation agreement, as land actively devoted to agriculture pursuant to section 63-604, Idaho Code.

As used in this section, “conservation agreement” means a written document between a private, nonprofit corporation enumerated in subsection (1) of this section and the landowner which defines wildlife, flora or fauna or freshwater biota to be protected and outlines a minimum of a ten (10) year management plan to protect target species and to control noxious weeds in accordance with Idaho noxious weed law in chapter 24, title 22, Idaho Code. Progress in managing the target species and controlling noxious weeds shall be monitored and an annual progress report shall be submitted each year along with the application filed as required in this section.

The conservation agreement or a copy of the document creating the conservation easement shall be filed with the county assessor by April 15 of the year for which application for the tax status is made. Following initial approval of an application in any tax year, for each subsequent, consecutive year in which application is made and the tax status is claimed, it shall not be necessary to resubmit the conservation agreement or a copy of the document creating the conservation easement unless the agreement or easement document has been amended. In the event the document is amended, the amended version shall be submitted with that year’s application.

§ 63-606. Equalization of aggregate values. [Repealed.]

§ 63-606A. Small employer growth incentive exemption.

The county board of equalization of any county in which any property, the investment in which qualifies for the income tax credits described in sections 63-4403 and 63-4404, Idaho Code, is located may exempt all or a portion of the value of such property from property taxation. The board may grant the exemption when it finds that the investments in such property benefit the citizens within the county and taxing districts within the county in a manner and to such a degree that to grant the exemption is necessary and just.

Property exempted under this section shall not be included on any new construction roll prepared by the county assessor in accordance with section 63-301A, Idaho Code.

Applications for the exemption under this section shall be considered by the board as other applications for exemption under section 63-501, Idaho Code. Upon request of the board, the state tax commission may disclose to the board or county official designated by the board information necessary to identify and determine the property upon which the exemption may be granted.

§ 63-607. Limitations. [Repealed.]

§ 63-608. [Reserved.]

§ 63-611 — 63-626. [Reserved.]

§ 63-602MM. [Reserved.]

§ 63-609, 63-610. Criterion of value — Meetings. [Repealed.]

§ 63-627, 63-628. Allocation of funds to county — State ad valorem and special state taxes. [Repealed.]